District of Columbia statutes.
1-325.155

Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority project.

(a)

Except as provided in § 1-325.156 and notwithstanding any other provision of this part, the budget authority for an approved capital project shall be reprogrammed, pursuant to Chapter 3 of Title 47 [§  47-301 et seq.], for use pursuant to subchapter IV-A of Chapter 11 of Title 9 [§ 9-1108.01 et seq.]; provided, that:

(1)

The capital project has been completed or the funds no longer considered necessary and budget authority remain available;

(2)

For a capital project with a balance of more than $250,000, no funds have been expended or encumbered for 3 consecutive years, and the agency has not notified the Chief Financial Officer within 30 days of the end of the 3-year period that the agency intends to use the funds to implement the project within 18 months; or

(3)

For a capital project with a remaining budget authority of $250,000 or less, the capital project has not been funded for 3 consecutive years.

(b)

If at any time the Chief Financial Officer determines that certain funds are not needed to meet the requirements of the WMATA project, those funds may be reprogrammed, pursuant to Chapter 3 of Title 47, to any capital project that the Chief Financial Officer certifies a funding need.

History

Mar. 3, 2010, D.C. Law 18-111, § 1265, 57 DCR 181
Oct. 22, 2015, D.C. Law 21-36, § 8042(f), 62 DCR 10905

Effect of Amendments

The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 21-36 added “Except as provided in § 1-325.155 and” in (a).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 1045 of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-187, August 26, 2009, 56 DCR 7374).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 1265 of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Second Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-207, October 15, 2009, 56 DCR 8234).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 1265 of Fiscal Year Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-260, January 4, 2010, 57 DCR 345).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 603 of Fiscal Year 2011 Supplemental Budget Support Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-694, January 19, 2011, 58 DCR 662).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 8042(f) of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-127, July 27, 2015, 62 DCR 10201).